South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 24-21-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 24-21-50.  (A) The board shall grant hearings and permit arguments and appearances by counsel or any individual before it at any such hearing while considering a case for parole, pardon, or any other form of clemency provided for under law. (B) No Only a potential paroleeinmate who is being considered for parole or his counsel has a right of confrontation at the hearing. (C) All testimony presented at a parole hearing must be taken under oath. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----